Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6323.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 22-7.4 of the General Laws entitled "Permanent Joint Committee on
Naming All New Buildings, Bridges, Edifices and Other State Constructions" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
22-7.4-157. Cpl. Richard C. Brule Bridge.
The East Bay Bike Path Bridge, located in the Town of Warren and which spans over the
Palmer River in the Town of Warren, shall hereafter be named the Cpl. Richard C. Brule Bridge.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002898
========